Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Article 2. Special Museum Districts

§ 18-10-201.
Petition of property owners; public hearing; written protests; election.

through (d) Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 5.

A special museum district may be established under the procedures for petitioning, hearing and election of special districts as set forth in the Special District Elections Act of 1994.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 142, § 1; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1991, ch. 70, § 1; 1994, ch. 99, § 2; 1996, ch. 97, § 2; 1998, ch. 115, § 2.

§ 18-10-202.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1969, ch. 142, § 2, related to establishment of districts.

§ 18-10-203.
District a body corporate; name; powers.

Each district established is a body corporate by the name of “the . . . . . museum district”. The name shall be selected by the board of county commissioners of the county in which the greater area of land within the district is located and will be entered in their records.

The district may:

Hold property and be a party to contracts;

Sue and be sued;

Through its governing board acquire property for museum purposes by gift, devise, bequest or purchase or contract for the acquisition by purchase or lease of real and personal property;

Convey, lease and otherwise dispose of property for museum purposes;

Establish sinking funds for museum purposes;

Issue bonds for the purchase of real property, improvements and equipment as provided by W.S.

18-10-214

;

Make rules and regulations as necessary for the proper operation of the district, which shall be filed with the county clerk for each county in which the district is located.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 142, § 3; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1994, ch. 99, § 2.

Law reviews. —

See article, “Governmental Immunity from Damage Actions in Wyoming — Part II,” VII Land & Water L. Rev. 617 (1972).

§ 18-10-204.
Election of trustees; generally; terms.

An election of the six (6) initial trustees shall be held at the same time as the election to form the district under W.S.

18-10-201

and in accordance with the Special District Elections Act of 1994, including by mail ballot. The board of trustees elected shall govern the district affairs and serve without compensation. At the first subsequent director election three (3) members shall be elected to serve until the next subsequent director district election and three (3) members elected to serve until the second subsequent director district election and until their successors are elected and qualified.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 142, § 4; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1994, ch. 99, § 2; 1998, ch. 115, § 2.

§ 18-10-205.
Trustee terms.

Trustees shall hold office for four (4) years and until their successors are duly elected and qualified.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 142, § 5; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1996, ch. 97, § 2; 1998, ch. 115, § 2.

§ 18-10-206.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1969, ch. 142, §§ 6, 7, related to voters generally.

§§ 18-10-207 through 18-10-212.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1969, ch. 142, §§ 8 through 12, related to election preparations and to district trustees.

§ 18-10-213.
Administration of finances; assessments and taxation.

Annually, each county assessor shall provide the board of county commissioners with the total assessed value of all taxable property within a special museum district in his county.

The board of county commissioners at the same time they levy for county purposes shall levy a tax not exceeding one (1) mill upon the taxable property in the district in its county for its proportionate share based on the assessed valuation and the estimated amount of funds needed by each district. The taxes shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as state and county taxes. The tax levy provided by this section shall not be construed as being a part of the general county mill levy.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 142, § 14; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 2012, ch. 98, § 1; 2017 ch. 62, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2012 amendment,

substituted “Uniform Municipal Fiscal Procedures Act” for “Wyoming Municipal Budget Act” in (a).

Laws 2012, ch. 98 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2012.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, deleted the first sentence of (a), which read: “The board of trustees of special cemetery districts shall administer the finances of such districts according to the provisions of the Uniform Municipal Fiscal Procedures Act, W.S.

16-4-101

through

16-4-125

, and file a report as provided by W.S.

9-1-507

.”

Wyoming Municipal Budget Act. —

The Wyoming Municipal Budget Act, referred to in the first sentence in subsection (a), appeared as §§ 9-7-301 through 9-7-316 before being repealed in 1980, prior to the 1982 revision of title 9. Present similar provisions appear as §§

16-4-101

through

16-4-124

, the Uniform Municipal Fiscal Procedures Act.

§ 18-10-214.
Coupon bonds; generally.

The board of trustees of special museum districts may submit to the electors of the district the question whether the board shall be authorized to issue coupon bonds of the district to a certain amount, not to exceed two percent (2%) of the assessed value of the taxable property in the district, bearing interest at a certain rate, payable and redeemable at a certain time not exceeding twenty-five (25) years, for constructing or acquiring property for museum purposes.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 142, § 16; 1971, ch. 254, § 17; W.S. 1977, §

18-10-215

; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 28, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Section

18-10-214

, which was enacted by § 1, ch. 124, Laws 1977, and which related to exempting property of districts from taxation, was repealed pursuant to § 4, ch. 124, Laws 1977. Accordingly, §§

18-10-215

to 18-10-220 have been redesignated as §§

18-10-214

to

18-10-219

, respectively, in order to maintain proper numerical sequence.

§ 18-10-215.
Election; ballots.

The election authorized under W.S.

18-10-214

shall be called by the boards of county commissioners and conducted, canvassed and returned in the manner provided for bond elections by the Political Subdivision Bond Election Law, W.S.

22-21-101

through

22-21-112

.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 142, § 17; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1996, ch. 97, § 2.

§ 18-10-216.
Form; notice; bids; sale.

If the proposal to issue bonds is approved, the board of trustees may issue bonds in such form as they decide and shall give notice by publication in some newspaper published in the counties in which the district is located and in some newspaper of general circulation in Cheyenne, Wyoming of its intention to issue and negotiate such bonds and to invite bidders therefor. In no case shall the bonds be sold for less than their full or par value and the accrued interest thereon at the time of their delivery. The trustees may reject any bids or sell the bonds at private sale if they deem it for the best interest of the district.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 142, § 18; 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 18-10-217.
Preparation and execution.

After ascertaining the best terms and the lowest interest at which the bonds can be negotiated, the board shall secure the proper engraving and printing and consecutive numbering thereof and the bonds shall then be properly prepared and executed. They must bear the signature of the president of the board of trustees and be countersigned by the county treasurer of the county in which the funds of the district are kept, and the coupons attached to the bonds must be signed by the president, secretary and county treasurer. The secretary of the board shall endorse and sign in his official capacity a certificate upon every bond that it is within the lawful debt limit of the district and is issued according to law. When so executed the bonds shall be registered by the county treasurer where the funds of the district are kept in a book provided for that purpose, which must show the number and amount of each bond and the person to whom it is issued.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 142, § 19; 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 18-10-218.
Preparation and execution; full faith and credit; payment of principal and interest.

The full faith and credit of each museum district is solemnly pledged for the payment of the interest and the redemption of the principal of all bonds which are issued by the district.

The county treasurer where the funds of the district are kept may pay out of the district tax fund the interest and principal due upon any bonds upon presentation at his office of the proper coupon or bond which must show the amount due and each coupon must also show the number of the bond to which it belonged. All bonds and coupons so paid must be reported to the district trustees at their first regular meeting thereafter.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 142, §§ 20, 21; 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 18-10-219.
Existing museums not affected; museum may submit to electors question of organizing district.

All archaeological, geological and historical museums and any mill levy made pursuant to W.S.

18-10-101

through

18-10-105

shall not be affected by the provisions of W.S.

18-10-201

through

18-10-218

. Any archaeological, geological or historical museum, by a majority vote of the board of trustees may submit to the qualified electors of the county, or any portion thereof, in which the museum is located the question of organizing a special museum district under the provisions of and in accordance with the procedures specified in W.S.

18-10-201

through

18-10-219

.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 142, § 22; 1977, ch. 124, § 1.